Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1701
Act; purpose; applicability.

The purpose of the Nebraska Consultants' Competitive Negotiation Act is to provide managerial control over competitive negotiations by the state for acquisition of professional architectural, engineering, landscape architecture, or land surveying services. The act does not apply to (1) contracts under section 57-1503, (2) contracts under subsection (6) of section 39-1349, (3) contracts under sections 39-2808 to 39-2823 except as provided in section 39-2810, (4) contracts under the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act except as provided in section 37-1719, or (5) contracts under the State Building Construction Alternatives Act except as provided in section 73-1105.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 1;

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB4, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB312, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB960, § 30;

Laws 2018, LB775, § 36;

Laws 2019, LB616, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB660, § 30.

State Building Construction Alternatives Act, see section 73-1101.

State Park System Construction Alternatives Act, see section 37-1701.